Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1042
School funds; embezzlement by school district treasurer.

Except as provided by section 79-1043, school district treasurers shall not lend or use any part of the school money which may be in their hands under penalty of fine and imprisonment as provided regarding embezzlement under sections 28-509 to 28-518.

Laws 1881, c. 78, subdivision XI, § 9, p. 370;

R.S.1913, § 6936;

C.S.1922, § 6519;

C.S.1929, § 79-2008;

R.S.1943, § 79-2008;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 383, p. 820;

Laws 1959, c. 382, § 5, p. 1326;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1308;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 688.